Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1505
Stay of execution; maximum period.

No stay of execution or order of sale upon any judgment or decree shall be granted for a longer time than nine months after the entry of such judgment or decree.

Laws 1875, § 1, p. 49;

R.S.1913, § 8046;

C.S.1922, § 8987;

C.S.1929, § 20-1505;

R.S.1943, § 25-1505;

Laws 1999, LB 43, § 5.

Legislature had in mind the matter of stays of execution on judgments and decrees where the ultimate purpose was the recovery of money only, and not payments for child support in divorce decree. Wassung v. Wassung, 136 Neb. 440, 286 N.W. 340 (1939).

Where defendants avail themselves of the statutory stay of execution, they are estopped from attacking such judgment in any way. Bowman v. Caldwell, 135 Neb. 554, 283 N.W. 194 (1939).

Divorced wife may continue to claim homestead interest. Federal Credit Co. v. Reynolds, 132 Neb. 495, 272 N.W. 397 (1937).

Taking stay is an appearance, and waives all prior defects or error. Party is estopped to attack judgment. Franse v. Armbuster, 28 Neb. 467, 44 N.W. 481 (1890); Miller v. Hyers, 11 Neb. 474, 9 N.W. 645 (1881).

Mortgage debtor has right to nine months stay. Rafert v. Federal Farm Mortgage Corporation, 152 F.2d 193 (8th Cir. 1945).